Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202666-2212
Governor; executive order suspending E-15 access standard, when.

The Governor may issue or renew an executive order that temporarily suspends the E-15 access standard if there is an inadequate supply of E-15 gasoline or the market price of E-15 gasoline may cause consumers to suffer economic hardship.

Laws 2023, LB562, § 5.